Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.130

Approaches to county roads—Rules regarding construction—Penalty.

(1) No person shall be permitted to build or construct any approach to any county road without first obtaining permission therefor from the board.

(2) The boards of the several counties of the state may adopt reasonable rules for the construction of approaches which, when complied with, shall entitle a person to build or construct an approach from any abutting property to any county road. The rules may include provisions for the construction of culverts under the approaches, the depth of fills over the culverts, and for such other drainage facilities as the board deems necessary. The construction of approaches, culverts, fills, or such other drainage facilities as may be required, shall be under the supervision of the county road engineer, and all such construction shall be at the expense of the person benefited by the construction.

(3) Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 208; 1963 c 4 s 36.75.130. Prior: 1943 c 174 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-95.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.